Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.090

Condemnation of infected property—Duty to comply—Inspector's duty on failure—Lien for costs.

Except as hereinabove provided, upon service of said notice the owner or person in possession or charge of the premises or property shall comply with its terms within the time specified. In case of their failure so to do, the inspector may enter the premises and perform or cause to be performed the services required in the notice. He or she shall keep an accurate account of the expense of performing said services, which shall become a lien on the premises or property which may be foreclosed in the manner herein provided. The lien on personal property shall have preference over all other liens.

If the inspector has not disinfected or destroyed the property it may be declared a nuisance as herein provided and treated as such.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6008; 1961 c 11 s 15.08.090. Prior: (i) 1943 c 150 s 4, part; 1929 c 150 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 108 s 1, part; 1919 c 195 s 2 1/2, part; 1915 c 166 s 10, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2848, part. (ii) 1943 c 150 s 5; 1935 c 168 s 4; 1931 c 27 s 2; 1927 c 311 s 4; 1915 c 166 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2849.]